Wyoming, session 2026, HB0125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-16-1420(a)(vi)(D), (E) and by
creating a new subparagraph (F), 17-16-1530(a)(viii)(C),
(D) and by creating a new subparagraph (E),
17-19-1420(a)(v)(C), (D) and by creating a new subparagraph
(E), 17-19-1530(a)(vii)(C), (D) and by creating a new
subparagraph (E), 17-29-705(c)(iii)(D), (E) and by creating
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
a new subparagraph (F) and 17-30-904(h)(iii)(D), (E) and by
creating a new subparagraph (F) are amended to read:

17-16-1420. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-16-1421 to administratively dissolve a
corporation if any of the following has occurred:

(vi) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:

(D) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(E) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(F) Has a board member who has been
convicted of or found civilly liable for any act that
constitutes fraud against another person under the laws of
the United States or the laws of this state.

17-16-1530. Grounds for revocation.

(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-16-1531 to revoke the certificate of
authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state if:

(viii) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:

(C) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(E) Has a board member who has been
convicted of or found civilly liable for any act that
constitutes fraud against another person under the laws of
the United States or the laws of this state.

17-19-1420. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-19-1421 to administratively dissolve a
corporation if any of the following has occurred:

(v) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:

HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
(C) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(E) Board member has been convicted of or
found civilly liable for any act that constitutes fraud
against another person under the laws of the United States
or the laws of this state.

17-19-1530. Grounds for revocation.

(a) The secretary of state may commence a proceeding
under W.S. 17-19-1531 to revoke the certificate of
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state if any of the following has
occurred:

(vii) It is in the public interest and the
corporation:

(C) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(D) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(E) Has a board member who has been
convicted of or found civilly liable for any act that
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
constitutes fraud against another person under the laws of
the United States or the laws of this state.

17-29-705. Administrative forfeiture of authority and
articles of organization.

(c) A limited liability company shall be deemed to be
transacting business within this state without authority,
to have forfeited any franchises, rights or privileges
acquired under the laws thereof and shall be deemed defunct
and to have forfeited its articles of organization or
certificate of authority acquired under the laws of this
state, and the forfeiture shall be made effective in the
manner provided in subsection (a) of this section, if:

(iii) It is in the public interest and the
limited liability company or any of its members:

(D) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(E) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(F) Has been convicted of or found civilly
liable for any act that constitutes fraud against another
person under the laws of the United States or the laws of
this state.

17-30-904. Administrative forfeiture of authority and
articles of formation.

(h) A statutory foundation shall be deemed to be
operating within this state without authority, to have
forfeited any rights or privileges acquired under the laws
of this state and shall be deemed to have forfeited its
articles of formation filed in this state if:

HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462
(iii) The public interest is served by
forfeiture and the statutory foundation, its founder or any
other person authorized to act on behalf of the statutory
foundation:

(D) Is owned or controlled by a foreign
government or foreign nongovernment person determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States secretary of
commerce and specified in 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a) or a successor
regulation, except if the ownership or control has been
approved by the committee on foreign investment in the
United States; or

(E) Has provided false or fraudulent
information to the registered agent, as determined by the
secretary of state during or following an examination of
records pursuant to W.S. 17-28-108 or following
notification by the registered agent;. or

(F) Has been convicted of or found civilly
liable for any act that constitutes fraud against another
person under the laws of the United States or the laws of
this state.
HB0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0462

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0125